test_min.aff
SET UTF-8
FLAG UTF-8
NEEDAFFIX X
SFX э Y 1
SFX э 0 0 .
SFX Ѐ Y 1
SFX Ѐ 0 ı .
SFX џ Y 1
SFX џ 0 a .
SFX Х Y 116
SFX Х 0 da [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 daydı [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 daydım [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 daydın [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 daydık [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 daydınız [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 daydılar [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 daymış [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 daymışım [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 daymışsın [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 daymışız [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 daymışsınız [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 daymışlar [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 daysa [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 daysam [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 daysan [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 daysak [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 daysanız [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 daysalar [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 dayım [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 dasın [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 dayız [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 dasınız [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 dalar [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 dadır [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 dadırlar [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 dalardır [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 dayken [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 dayımdır [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 dasındır [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 dayızdır [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 dasınızdır [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 daki [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 dakiler [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 dakilerin [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 dakilere [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 dakilerde [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 dakilerden [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 dakilerle [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 dakilerce [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 dakileri [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 dakilerini [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 dakilerine [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 dakilerinde [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 dakilerinden [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 dakileriyle [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 dakilerinin [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 dakini [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 dakine [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 dakinde [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 dakinden [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 dakinin [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 dakiyle [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 dakiyse [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 dakidir [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 dakiydi [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 dakiymiş [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 dakiyken [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 ta [çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 taydı [çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 taydım [çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 taydın [çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 taydık [çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 taydınız [çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 taydılar [çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 taymış [çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 taymışım [çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 taymışsın [çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 taymışız [çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 taymışsınız [çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 taymışlar [çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 taysa [çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 taysam [çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 taysan [çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 taysak [çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 taysanız [çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 taysalar [çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 tayım [çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 tasın [çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 tayız [çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 tasınız [çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 talar [çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 tadır [çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 tadırlar [çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 talardır [çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 tayken [çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 tayımdır [çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 tasındır [çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 tayızdır [çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 tasınızdır [çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 taki [çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 takiler [çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 takilerin [çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 takilere [çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 takilerde [çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 takilerden [çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 takilerle [çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 takilerce [çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 takileri [çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 takilerini [çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 takilerine [çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 takilerinde [çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 takilerinden [çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 takileriyle [çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 takilerinin [çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 takini [çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 takine [çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 takinde [çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 takinden [çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 takinin [çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 takiyle [çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 takiyse [çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 takidir [çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 takiydi [çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 takiymiş [çfhkpsşt]
SFX Х 0 takiyken [çfhkpsşt]
SFX щ Y 80
SFX щ 0 dan [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX щ 0 dandı [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX щ 0 dandım [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX щ 0 dandın [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX щ 0 dandık [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX щ 0 dandınız [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX щ 0 dandılar [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX щ 0 dantı [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX щ 0 dantım [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX щ 0 dantın [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX щ 0 dantık [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX щ 0 dantınız [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX щ 0 dantılar [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX щ 0 danmış [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX щ 0 danmışım [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX щ 0 danmışsın [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX щ 0 danmışız [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX щ 0 danmışsınız [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX щ 0 danmışlar [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX щ 0 dansa [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX щ 0 dansam [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX щ 0 dansan [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX щ 0 dansak [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX щ 0 dansanız [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX щ 0 dansalar [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX щ 0 danım [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX щ 0 dansın [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX щ 0 danız [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX щ 0 dansınız [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX щ 0 danlar [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX щ 0 dandır [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX щ 0 dantır [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX щ 0 dandırlar [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX щ 0 dantırlar [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX щ 0 danlardır [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX щ 0 danken [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX щ 0 danımdır [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX щ 0 dansındır [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX щ 0 danızdır [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX щ 0 dansınızdır [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX щ 0 tan [çfhkpsşt]
SFX щ 0 tandı [çfhkpsşt]
SFX щ 0 tandım [çfhkpsşt]
SFX щ 0 tandın [çfhkpsşt]
SFX щ 0 tandık [çfhkpsşt]
SFX щ 0 tandınız [çfhkpsşt]
SFX щ 0 tandılar [çfhkpsşt]
SFX щ 0 tantı [çfhkpsşt]
SFX щ 0 tantım [çfhkpsşt]
SFX щ 0 tantın [çfhkpsşt]
SFX щ 0 tantık [çfhkpsşt]
SFX щ 0 tantınız [çfhkpsşt]
SFX щ 0 tantılar [çfhkpsşt]
SFX щ 0 tanmış [çfhkpsşt]
SFX щ 0 tanmışım [çfhkpsşt]
SFX щ 0 tanmışsın [çfhkpsşt]
SFX щ 0 tanmışız [çfhkpsşt]
SFX щ 0 tanmışsınız [çfhkpsşt]
SFX щ 0 tanmışlar [çfhkpsşt]
SFX щ 0 tansa [çfhkpsşt]
SFX щ 0 tansam [çfhkpsşt]
SFX щ 0 tansan [çfhkpsşt]
SFX щ 0 tansak [çfhkpsşt]
SFX щ 0 tansanız [çfhkpsşt]
SFX щ 0 tansalar [çfhkpsşt]
SFX щ 0 tanım [çfhkpsşt]
SFX щ 0 tansın [çfhkpsşt]
SFX щ 0 tanız [çfhkpsşt]
SFX щ 0 tansınız [çfhkpsşt]
SFX щ 0 tanlar [çfhkpsşt]
SFX щ 0 tandır [çfhkpsşt]
SFX щ 0 tantır [çfhkpsşt]
SFX щ 0 tandırlar [çfhkpsşt]
SFX щ 0 tantırlar [çfhkpsşt]
SFX щ 0 tanlardır [çfhkpsşt]
SFX щ 0 tanken [çfhkpsşt]
SFX щ 0 tanımdır [çfhkpsşt]
SFX щ 0 tansındır [çfhkpsşt]
SFX щ 0 tanızdır [çfhkpsşt]
SFX щ 0 tansınızdır [çfhkpsşt]
SFX Щ Y 66
SFX Щ 0 ın .
SFX Щ 0 ındı .
SFX Щ 0 ındım .
SFX Щ 0 ındın .
SFX Щ 0 ındık .
SFX Щ 0 ındınız .
SFX Щ 0 ındılar .
SFX Щ 0 ıntı .
SFX Щ 0 ıntım .
SFX Щ 0 ıntın .
SFX Щ 0 ıntık .
SFX Щ 0 ıntınız .
SFX Щ 0 ıntılar .
SFX Щ 0 ınmış .
SFX Щ 0 ınmışım .
SFX Щ 0 ınmışsın .
SFX Щ 0 ınmışız .
SFX Щ 0 ınmışsınız .
SFX Щ 0 ınmışlar .
SFX Щ 0 ınsa .
SFX Щ 0 ınsam .
SFX Щ 0 ınsan .
SFX Щ 0 ınsak .
SFX Щ 0 ınsanız .
SFX Щ 0 ınsalar .
SFX Щ 0 ınım .
SFX Щ 0 ınsın .
SFX Щ 0 ınız .
SFX Щ 0 ınsınız .
SFX Щ 0 ınlar .
SFX Щ 0 ındır .
SFX Щ 0 ıntır .
SFX Щ 0 ındırlar .
SFX Щ 0 ıntırlar .
SFX Щ 0 ınlardır .
SFX Щ 0 ınken .
SFX Щ 0 ınımdır .
SFX Щ 0 ınsındır .
SFX Щ 0 ınızdır .
SFX Щ 0 ınsınızdır .
SFX Щ 0 ınki .
SFX Щ 0 ınkiler .
SFX Щ 0 ınkilerin .
SFX Щ 0 ınkilere .
SFX Щ 0 ınkilerde .
SFX Щ 0 ınkilerden .
SFX Щ 0 ınkilerle .
SFX Щ 0 ınkilerce .
SFX Щ 0 ınkileri .
SFX Щ 0 ınkilerini .
SFX Щ 0 ınkilerine .
SFX Щ 0 ınkilerinde .
SFX Щ 0 ınkilerinden .
SFX Щ 0 ınkileriyle .
SFX Щ 0 ınkilerinin .
SFX Щ 0 ınkini .
SFX Щ 0 ınkine .
SFX Щ 0 ınkinde .
SFX Щ 0 ınkinden .
SFX Щ 0 ınkinin .
SFX Щ 0 ınkiyle .
SFX Щ 0 ınkiyse .
SFX Щ 0 ınkidir .
SFX Щ 0 ınkiydi .
SFX Щ 0 ınkiymiş .
SFX Щ 0 ınkiyken .
SFX С Y 32
SFX С 0 la .
SFX С 0 laydı .
SFX С 0 laydım .
SFX С 0 laydın .
SFX С 0 laydık .
SFX С 0 laydınız .
SFX С 0 laydılar .
SFX С 0 laymış .
SFX С 0 laymışım .
SFX С 0 laymışsın .
SFX С 0 laymışız .
SFX С 0 laymışsınız .
SFX С 0 laymışlar .
SFX С 0 laysa .
SFX С 0 laysam .
SFX С 0 laysan .
SFX С 0 laysak .
SFX С 0 laysanız .
SFX С 0 laysalar .
SFX С 0 layım .
SFX С 0 lasın .
SFX С 0 layız .
SFX С 0 lasınız .
SFX С 0 lalar .
SFX С 0 ladır .
SFX С 0 ladırlar .
SFX С 0 lalardır .
SFX С 0 layken .
SFX С 0 layımdır .
SFX С 0 lasındır .
SFX С 0 layızdır .
SFX С 0 lasınızdır .
SFX ч Y 64
SFX ч 0 ca [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX ч 0 caydı [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX ч 0 caydım [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX ч 0 caydın [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX ч 0 caydık [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX ч 0 caydınız [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX ч 0 caydılar [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX ч 0 caymış [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX ч 0 caymışım [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX ч 0 caymışsın [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX ч 0 caymışız [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX ч 0 caymışsınız [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX ч 0 caymışlar [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX ч 0 caysa [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX ч 0 caysam [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX ч 0 caysan [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX ч 0 caysak [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX ч 0 caysanız [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX ч 0 caysalar [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX ч 0 cayım [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX ч 0 casın [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX ч 0 cayız [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX ч 0 casınız [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX ч 0 calar [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX ч 0 cadır [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX ч 0 cadırlar [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX ч 0 calardır [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX ч 0 cayken [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX ч 0 cayımdır [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX ч 0 casındır [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX ч 0 cayızdır [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX ч 0 casınızdır [^çfhkpsşt]
SFX ч 0 ça [çfhkpsşt]
SFX ч 0 çaydı [çfhkpsşt]
SFX ч 0 çaydım [çfhkpsşt]
SFX ч 0 çaydın [çfhkpsşt]
SFX ч 0 çaydık [çfhkpsşt]
SFX ч 0 çaydınız [çfhkpsşt]
SFX ч 0 çaydılar [çfhkpsşt]
SFX ч 0 çaymış [çfhkpsşt]
SFX ч 0 çaymışım [çfhkpsşt]
SFX ч 0 çaymışsın [çfhkpsşt]
SFX ч 0 çaymışız [çfhkpsşt]
SFX ч 0 çaymışsınız [çfhkpsşt]
SFX ч 0 çaymışlar [çfhkpsşt]
SFX ч 0 çaysa [çfhkpsşt]
SFX ч 0 çaysam [çfhkpsşt]
SFX ч 0 çaysan [çfhkpsşt]
SFX ч 0 çaysak [çfhkpsşt]
SFX ч 0 çaysanız [çfhkpsşt]
SFX ч 0 çaysalar [çfhkpsşt]
SFX ч 0 çayım [çfhkpsşt]
SFX ч 0 çasın [çfhkpsşt]
SFX ч 0 çayız [çfhkpsşt]
SFX ч 0 çasınız [çfhkpsşt]
SFX ч 0 çalar [çfhkpsşt]
SFX ч 0 çadır [çfhkpsşt]
SFX ч 0 çadırlar [çfhkpsşt]
SFX ч 0 çalardır [çfhkpsşt]
SFX ч 0 çayken [çfhkpsşt]
SFX ч 0 çayımdır [çfhkpsşt]
SFX ч 0 çasındır [çfhkpsşt]
SFX ч 0 çayızdır [çfhkpsşt]
SFX ч 0 çasınızdır [çfhkpsşt]
